Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-343
Distributor; records; reports.

(1) A distributor shall maintain records of total sales of pickle card units and, within thirty days after the end of the calendar month or by the last day of the month following each monthly period, whichever comes first, shall report to the department, in a manner prescribed by the department, detailed information concerning each sale, which information shall include, but not be limited to, (a) the total number of units sold by such distributor, (b) the aggregate price for which such cards will be sold by the purchasing organization, and (c) any other information the department deems necessary.

(2) A distributor shall maintain a record of the serial number of each unit sold and the corresponding state identification stamp number assigned to each unit. Such information shall be made available to the department upon request.

Laws 1983, LB 259, § 48;

Laws 1984, LB 949, § 54;

Laws 1985, LB 408, § 32;

R.S.Supp.,1985, § 9-183;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 109;

Laws 1988, LB 1232, § 41;

Laws 1997, LB 248, § 16.